src/fst/morphology/stems/foreign_words.lexc
LEXICON foreign_words
unknown+A+OLang/ENG+Sg+Nom:unknown # ;
день+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Nom:день # ;
жизнь+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:жизни # ;
за+Pr:за # ;
коренный+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:коренных # ;
культура+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:культуры # ;
культура+N+OLang/RUS+Pl+Nom:культуры # ;
май+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Nom:май # ;
малочисленный+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:малочисленных # ;
межэтнический+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:межэтнических # ;
на+Pr:на # ;
народ+N+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:народов # ;
некоммерческий+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:некоммерческих # ;
новость+N+OLang/RUS+Pl+Nom:новости # ;
обский+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:обских # ;
обско-угорский+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:обско-угорских # ;
по+Pr:по # ;
развитие+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Nom:развитие # ;
Россия+N+Prop+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:России # ;
север+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:севера # ;
сохранить+V+Inf:сохранить # ;
спасти+V+Inf:спасти # ;
труд+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:труда # ;
финно-угорский+A+OLang/RUS+Pl+Gen:финно-угорских # ;
человек+N+OLang/RUS+Sg+Gen:человека # ;
